Missouri, session 2026, SB1206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 59.310, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 59.310,
to read as follows:
59.310. 1. The county recorder of deeds may refuse
any document presented for recording that does not meet the
following requirements:
(1) The document shall consist of one or more
individual pages printed only on one side and not
permanently bound nor in a continuous form. The document
shall not have any attachment stapled or otherwise affixed
to any page except as necessary to comply with statutory
requirements, provided that a document may be stapled
together for presentation for recording; a label that is
firmly attached with a bar code or return address may be
accepted for recording;
(2) The size of print or type shall not be smaller
than eight-point type and shall be in black or dark ink.
Should any document presented for recording contain type
smaller than eight-point type, such document shall be
accompanied by an exact typewritten copy not smaller than
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1206 2
eight-point type to be recorded contemporaneously as
additional pages of the document;
(3) The document must be of sufficient legibility to
produce a clear and legible reproduction thereof. Should
any document not be of sufficient legibility to produce a
clear and legible reproduction, such document shall be
accompanied by an exact typewritten copy not smaller than
eight-point type to be recorded contemporaneously as
additional pages of the document;
(4) The document shall be on white or light-colored
paper of not less than twenty-pound weight without
watermarks or other visible inclusions, except for plats and
surveys, which may be on materials such as Mylar or velum.
All text within the document shall be of sufficient color
and clarity to ensure that when the text is reproduced from
record, it shall be readable;
(5) All signatures on a document shall be in black or
dark ink, such that such signatures shall be of sufficient
color and clarity to ensure that when the text is reproduced
from record, it shall be readable, and shall have the
corresponding name typed, printed or stamped underneath said
signature. The typing or printing of any name or the
applying of an embossed or inked stamp shall not cover or
otherwise materially interfere with any part of the document
except where provided for by law;
(6) The documents shall have a top margin of at least
three inches of vertical space from left to right, to be
reserved for the recorder of deeds' certification and use.
All other margins on the document shall be a minimum of
three-fourths of one inch on all sides. Nonessential
information such as form numbers, page numbers or customer
notations may be placed in the margin. A document may be

SB 1206 3
recorded if a minor portion of a seal or incidental writing
extends beyond the margins. The recorder of deeds will not
incur any liability for not showing any seal or information
that extends beyond the margins of the permanent archival
record.
2. (1) Every document [containing any of the items
listed in this subsection] that is presented for recording,
except plats and surveys, shall contain the following and
shall have such information on the first page below the
three-inch horizontal margin:
[(1)] (a) The title of the document;
[(2)] (b) The date of the document;
[(3)] (c) All grantors' names and marital status;
[(4)] (d) All grantees' names;
[(5)] (e) Any statutory addresses;
[(6)] (f) The legal description of the property; and
[(7)] (g) Reference book and pages for statutory
requirements, if applicable.
(2) If there is not sufficient room on the first page
for all of the information required by subdivision (1) of
this subsection, the page reference within the document
where the information is set out shall be stated on the
first page.
3. From January 1, 2002, documents which do not meet
the requirements set forth in this section may be recorded
for an additional fee of twenty-five dollars, which shall be
deposited in the recorders' fund established pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 59.319.
4. Documents which are exempt from format requirements
and which the recorder of deeds may record include the
following:

SB 1206 4
(1) Documents which were signed prior to January 1,
2002;
(2) Military separation papers;
(3) Documents executed outside the United States;
(4) Certified copies of documents, including birth and
death certificates;
(5) Any document where one of the original parties is
deceased or otherwise incapacitated; and
(6) Judgments or other documents formatted to meet
court requirements.
5. Any document rejected by a recorder of deeds shall
be returned to the preparer or presenter accompanied by an
explanation of the reason it could not be recorded.
6. Recorders of deeds shall be allowed fees for their
services as follows:
(1) For recording every deed or instrument: five
dollars for the first page and three dollars for each page
thereafter except for plats and surveys;
(2) For copying or reproducing any recorded
100 instrument, except surveys and plats: a fee not to exceed
101 two dollars for the first page and one dollar for each page
102 thereafter;
103 (3) For every certificate and seal, except when
104 recording an instrument: one dollar;
105 (4) For recording a survey, subdivision plat [or
106 survey of a subdivision, outlets or condominiums: twenty-
107 five dollars for each sheet of drawings or calculations
108 based on a size not to exceed twenty-four inches in width by
109 eighteen inches in height. For recording a survey of one or
110 more tracts: five dollars for each sheet of drawings or
111 calculations based on a size not to exceed twenty-four
112 inches in width by eighteen inches in height. Any plat or

SB 1206 5
113 survey larger than eighteen inches by twenty-four inches
114 shall be counted as an additional sheet for each additional
115 eighteen inches by twenty-four inches, or fraction thereof,
116 plus five dollars per page of other material], condominium
117 plat, or other drawing depicting the division of land
118 prepared by a professional land surveyor:
119 (a) For drawings smaller than eighteen inches by
120 twenty-four inches, the fee shall be twenty-five dollars;
121 (b) The fee for any such drawing that measures one of
122 the following dimensions shall be as follows for each sheet
123 of drawings or other calculations:
124 18" by 24" $25.00
125 24" by 36" $50.00;
126 (c) For any such drawing that measures between
127 dimensions listed in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, the
128 fee for each sheet of drawings or calculations shall be
129 calculated at the rate for the larger listed dimension; and
130 (d) For drawings exceeding twenty-four inches by
131 thirty-six inches, the fee for each sheet of drawings or
132 other calculations shall be sixty dollars;
133 (5) For copying a survey, subdivision plat [or survey
134 of one or more tracts: a fee not to exceed five dollars for
135 each sheet of drawings and calculations not larger than
136 twenty-four inches in width and eighteen inches in height
137 and one dollar for each page of other material], condominium
138 plat, or other drawing depicting the division of land
139 prepared by a professional land surveyor:
140 (a) The fee for any such drawing that measures one of
141 the following dimensions shall be as follows for each sheet
142 of drawings or other calculations:

SB 1206 6
143 8 1/2" by 11" $1.00
144 11" by 17" $2.00
145 18" by 24" $5.00
146 24" by 36" $10.00;
147 (b) of this subdivision, the fee for each sheet of
148 drawings or calculations shall be calculated at the rate for
149 the larger listed dimension; and
150 (c) For drawings exceeding twenty-four inches by
151 thirty-six inches, the fee for each sheet of drawings or
152 other calculations shall be fifteen dollars;
153 (6) For a document which releases or assigns more than
154 one item: five dollars for each item beyond one released or
155 assigned in addition to any other charges which may apply;
156 (7) For every certified copy of a marriage license or
157 application for a marriage license: two dollars;
158 (8) For duplicate copies of the records in a medium
159 other than paper, the recorder of deeds shall set a
160 reasonable fee not to exceed the costs associated with
161 document search and duplication; and
162 (9) For all other use of equipment, personnel services
163 and office facilities, the recorder of deeds may set a
164 reasonable fee.
✓